Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5340.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Purpose and findings.
The purpose of this act is to require: (1) The department of environment management
("department") to establish a system to track the chain of custody of artificial turf installed on sports
and playing fields in the state; (2) The custodian of artificial turf sports or playing field installed in
the state to report chain of custody information to the department on or before a certain date or
within a certain amount of time after the completion of the installation, whichever is later; (3) The
new custodian of artificial turf that was removed after the chain of custody information was
reported to the department under this act to report updated chain of custody information to the
department; (4) The department to serve as the custodian for chain of custody information
submitted under this act and develop and maintain a website that includes certain chain of custody
information.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-17.1 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Environmental
Management" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-17.1-46. Environment -- Artificial turf -- Chain of custody.
(a) Definitions. When used in this section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Artificial turf" has the same meaning as defined in § 23-18.18-3 and that:
(i) Is intended to have, or incidentally has, an appearance that mimics grass;

(ii) Functions as a replacement for grass;
(iii) Has the primary purpose of being used as an indoor or outdoor sports or playing field;
(iv) Is at least five thousand square feet (5,000 ft2) in size; and
(v) Includes shock pads and turf infill.
(2) "Custodian" means a person who owns or is in control of artificial turf in the state or
any current or subsequent owner of a property on which there is existing artificial turf. Custodians
may also include those in control of charter schools, daycare centers, colleges and universities,
municipal athletic facilities, private athletic clubs, or other facilities where artificial turf is used.
(3) "Department" means the department of environmental management.
(4) "Producer" means a person who owns or licenses a trademark or brand under which
artificial turf is sold, offered for sale, distributed, or offered for promotional purposes in the state;
or imports artificial turf into the state for sale or distribution.
(5) "Turf infill" means a material that:
(i) Is poured on top of artificial turf to hold artificial turf blades in place;
(ii) Weighs down the artificial turf in order that it does not develop wrinkles or buckle;
(iii) Mimics the impact absorption properties of soil under natural grass; and
(iv) Includes shredded or granulated tire, rubber, silica sand, or other material that is used
as infill on artificial turf.
(b) The department shall establish a system to track the chain of custody of artificial turf
installed on sports and playing fields in the state, from the transportation, installation, and removal
of the artificial turf to its reuse, recycling, and final disposal.
(c) On or before January 1, 2026, or within thirty (30) days after the completion of the
installation, whichever is later, the custodian of artificial turf sports or playing field installed in the
state, including a replacement or brand new artificial turf sports or playing field, shall report to the
department the following information:
(1) The geographic location and street address of the installed artificial turf;
(2) The name, address, and contact information of:
(i) The custodian of the artificial turf;
(ii) The producer of the artificial turf; and
(iii) The business or contractor that installed the artificial turf;
(3) The type and brand of artificial turf installed, to include detailed information on the
composition of the infill and whether the turf is indoors or outdoors;
(4) The area of the artificial turf in square feet;
(5) The weight of the artificial turf;
LC000755 - Page 2 of 5

(6) The date the artificial turf was installed;
(7) The distance to and name of the nearest down gradient surface body of water; and
(8) Any other information required by the department.
(d)(1) Except as provided in subsection (d)(2) of this section, if the artificial turf is removed
after the chain of custody information is reported to the department under subsection (b) of this
section, the new custodian of the artificial turf shall report to the department:
(i) The new geographic location and street address of the artificial turf;
(ii) The name, address, and contact information of:
(A) The transporter of the artificial turf; and
(B) The new custodian of the artificial turf;
(iii) The area of the artificial turf in square feet;
(iv) To the extent practicable, the weight of the artificial turf;
(v) How the artificial turf is used at the new location, including whether the artificial turf
is recycled, processed for final disposal, or used to refurbish or replace a sports or playing field;
(vi) If the artificial turf is installed at a sports or playing field, the date of installation; and
(vii) Any other information reasonably related to the chain of custody of artificial turf, as
required by the department.
(2) A new custodian of artificial turf that transports the artificial turf for use or disposal
out-of-state shall report to the department the information required under subsections (d)(1)(i), (ii),
(iii), (iv), and (vii) of this section.
(e) Chain of custody information shall be:
(1) Reported in writing to the department; and
(2) In a form required by the department.
(f) A custodian shall not be penalized for variation in the weight totals reported under
subsection (d) of this section.
(g) The department shall:
(1) Serve as the repository for the chain of custody information submitted under this
section; and
(2) Maintain the chain of custody information permanently; and
(3) Develop and maintain a publicly accessible website on or before July 1, 2027, that
includes:
(i) The chain of custody information submitted to the department under this section; and
(ii) The names and contact information of each custodian that provided the chain of custody
information.
LC000755 - Page 3 of 5

(h)(1) With regard to violations subject to subsection (c) of this section, a person that
violates the provisions of this section is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding five thousand dollars
($5,000).
(2) A penalty shall not be imposed under this section unless a person is first issued a written
notice of violation.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000755
========
LC000755 - Page 4 of 5